District of Columbia statutes.
50-211.06

Alternative fuel.

(a)

On or before April 15, 2013, the Mayor shall transmit to the Council a plan to expand the use of alternative fuels in District government vehicles, whether through the use of government-owned fueling stations or privately operated fueling stations.

(b)

In developing this plan, consideration should be given to requiring fueling stations that sell fuel to the District to:

(1)

Provide at least one alternative fuel;

(2)

Use industry standard fueling equipment that is compatible with existing government vehicles; and

(3)

Sell alternative fuels to the general public.

History

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-223, § 106, 59 DCR 13537

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-211.02.

Editor's Notes

Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-223 provided that §§ 101, 102, 104, 105(a), 105(b), 106, 107, 201(a), 201(b), 201(c), 202, 203, and 301 of the act shall apply as of Mar. 5, 2013.